California statutes. Education Code
(c) “Region” means the regional planning unit as defined by California’s Unified Strategic Workforce Development Plan, developed by the California Workforce Development Board, pursuant to the federal
 Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113–128).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 88.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

53023.

Contingent upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or other statute, the department shall administer the Golden State Pathways Program as a competitive grant program. In order to be eligible to receive a grant award, grant recipients shall do the following, as applicable:

(a) Commit to providing participating pupils with all of the following:

(1) An integrated program of study that includes all of the courses to meet the A–G course requirements needed to be eligible for admission to the University of California or the California State University and at least one of the other criteria to be considered prepared for the purposes of meeting academic and career-readiness standards
 as defined in the College/Career Indicator associated with the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to Section 52064.5. Local educational agencies are encouraged to integrate career pathways content and applications into A–G courses. Local educational agencies may also provide or expand access to courses that satisfy A–G course requirements through existing programs such as:

(A) UC Scout, which is a University of California Student Academic Preparation and Educational Partnerships (SAPEP) program that develops and delivers A–G approved online classes and curriculum to pupils.

(B) University of California and California State University extended learning programs that offer college preparatory courses that fulfill the A–G subject requirements for admission to the University of California and the California State University.

(2) The opportunity to earn at least 12 postsecondary credits that are applicable toward the completion of a degree, certificate, or credential through any of the following:

(A) (i) Consistent with the requirements of Section 76004, College and Career Access Pathways dual enrollment courses.

(ii) To meet the requirements of clause (i), grant recipients are expected to establish, expand, or maintain a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement with their local community college district consistent with the requirements of Section 76004.

(B) Advanced Placement courses.

(C) International Baccalaureate courses.

(3) Opportunities to participate in work-based learning experiences in partnership with regional businesses and industries, state and local governmental entities, and nonprofit and community-based organizations that do all of the following:

(A) Integrate career awareness and career exposure activities.

(B) Emphasize opportunities to pupils in paid internships, preapprenticeships, or apprenticeships that offer pupils the ability to learn technical and professional skills.

(C) Emphasize opportunities for pupils to develop social and professional networks that will better enable them to launch their careers.

(4) Integrated support services necessary to address a pupil’s social, emotional, and
 academic needs.

(b) Develop and integrate standards-based academics with a career-relevant, sequenced curriculum following industry-themed pathways that are aligned to high-skill, high-wage, or high-demand jobs in their regional economy or the state economy.

(c) Provide articulated pathways from high school to postsecondary education and training that are aligned with the workforce development needs of their regional economy.

(d) Collaborate with other local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, local and regional employers, and other relevant community interest holders to develop, or expand the availability of, innovative college and career pathways that align with their regional labor market needs.

(e) Leverage available resources or
 in-kind contributions from public, private, and philanthropic sources to sustain the ongoing operation of their Golden State Pathways Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 88.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

53023.5.

Community college districts may partner with local educational agencies to submit applications to receive funding under this program to support the offering of a Golden State Pathways Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 88.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

53024.

(a) As a condition of receiving a Golden State Pathways Program grant, a recipient shall:

(1) Not use Golden State Pathways Program grant funds to supplant state, federal, or any other public or private sources of funding that is otherwise, or would otherwise be, used to support the activities required of a Golden State Pathways Program grant recipient.

(2) Identify and set aside funding within its own budget or obtain funding commitments from program partners to fully sustain the ongoing operation of their Golden State Pathways Program and how other programs would be supported or integrated with, or that have been aligned with, a local educational agency’s Golden State
 Pathways Program.

(b) A grant recipient subject to the requirements of Sections 52060 and 52061, Sections 52066 and 52067, or Section 47606.5, as applicable, shall ensure that the activities supported by a Golden State Pathways Program grant are in alignment with the priorities and activities of the grant recipient’s local control and accountability plan.

(c) (1) A grant recipient shall annually collect and submit data, disaggregated by pupil subgroup, on outcome measures to the department, which shall include, but are not limited to, the quality indicators described in the California State Plan for Career Technical Education required by the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V), and all of the following as applicable:

(A) Pupil academic
 performance indicators, including information disaggregated by pupil subgroups.

(B) The number and rate of school or program graduates by pupil subgroups.

(C) The rate of pupils completing the courses to meet the A–G course requirements needed to be eligible for admission to the University of California or the California State University at the participating schoolsite, disaggregated by pupils participating in a pathways program pursuant to this chapter and pupils not participating in a pathways program pursuant to this chapter.

(D) The number of postsecondary credits earned, internships and apprenticeships completed, and career technical education courses completed.

(E) Attainment of certificates, credentials, and degrees.

(F) Postsecondary enrollment, or pupils who meet the requirements to be considered a pupil who successfully transferred to a four-year university for purposes of Section 84750.4.

(G) Transitions to employment, apprenticeships, or job training in the industry sector educational pathway program offered by the participating local educational agency.

(H) The number of pupils completing career technical education coursework and the number of pupils completing a career technical education pathway consisting of a sequence of two or more career technical education courses in the same career technical education subject matter discipline.

(2) To the extent feasible, it is the intent of the Legislature that upon the implementation of the California Cradle-to-Career
 Data System established in Section 10860, the data required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be integrated within the California Cradle-to-Career Data System.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 88.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

53025.

(a) The Superintendent, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall award grants on a competitive basis to grant recipients for the following:

(1) Consortium development and planning grants to support collaborative planning between a grant recipient and their program partners in the development of high-quality college and career pathways opportunities that are consistent with the requirements of this chapter. Of the amounts appropriated to support the Golden State Pathways Program, the Superintendent may use up to 10 percent of the funds for consortium development and planning grants.

(2) Implementation grants to support a grant recipient’s ability to offer participating
 pupils high-quality college and career pathways opportunities consistent with the requirements of this chapter. Of the amounts appropriated to support the Golden State Pathways Program, the Superintendent shall use not less than 85 percent of the funds for implementation grants.

(b) (1) Of the amounts appropriated to support the Golden State Pathways Program, the Superintendent may use up to 5 percent of the appropriation to contract, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, with up to 10 local educational agencies for the provision of technical assistance to local educational agencies, applicants, and grant recipients that is aligned to technical assistance provided for other College and career readiness initiatives, including, but not limited to, those established pursuant to this chapter and the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program pursuant to Chapter 16.5 (commencing with
 Section 53070). Of these technical assistance grantees, one local educational agency with demonstrated expertise in the design and implementation of college and career pathways will act as the lead technical assistance grantee and work with the department to provide leadership and direction for the other technical assistance grantees, who will provide technical assistance to different regions in the state.

(2) To be eligible for the contract pursuant to paragraph (1), the local educational agency shall commit to all of the following:

(A) Assisting local educational agencies in the continuous improvement of their Golden State Pathways Programs.

(B) Leveraging evidence-based program frameworks, such as linked learning framework and quality standards, to provide assistance to grantees.

(C) Providing prospective applicants and grantees with feedback regarding the development of their planned application, implementation, and continuous improvement of their Golden State Pathways Program and other career technical education programs, courses, and pathways that have been integrated with, or that have been aligned with, a local educational agency’s Golden State Pathways Program.

(D) Creating a community of practice network that enables grantees to share best practices with other grantees and other interested local educational agencies.

(E) Assisting grant recipients with the collection and reporting of required data pursuant to this chapter.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Superintendent identify and contract with a local
 educational agency to provide technical assistance consistent with the requirements of paragraph (2) not less than three months prior to grant applications being due to the Superintendent.

(4) The Superintendent, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall contract with an independent entity to evaluate the program’s effectiveness in meeting the goals described in Section 53021. This evaluation shall be completed no sooner than June 30, 2027, and no later than June 30, 2030.

(5) Any funds used by the Superintendent for purposes of paragraph (1) shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure
 until June 30, 2029.

(6) On or before June 30, 2028, the department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the Department of Finance, and the Governor on the process for awarding grants, the name of each grant recipient, the amount awarded to each grant recipient, and the activities provided with grant funds.

(c) In determining the grant amounts for an implementation grant and for a consortium development and planning grant, the Superintendent, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall consider all of the following:

(1) The number of pupils
 enrolled by the applicant.

(2) The number of pathways programs proposed to be established or expanded by the applicant and the number of schoolsites that would participate in the pathways program.

(3) The estimated number of pupils that would be enrolled in the applicant’s pathways programs.

(4) The number of entities collaborating with the applicant to achieve the goal outlined in subdivision (a) of Section 53021.

(d) An applicant seeking a grant under this chapter shall submit an application to the Superintendent at a time, in a manner, and with any appropriate information, as the Superintendent may reasonably require. Each grant application submitted shall include all of the following:

(1) A description and documentation of how the applicant will collaborate with their local or regional interest holders to develop or offer high-quality college and career pathways opportunities consistent with the requirements of this chapter.

(2) A description of all of the educational, career, or support services to be provided at the schoolsite, a partnering college or university site, virtually, or at the locations where eligible work-based learning would occur.

(3) A description regarding how the applicant’s Golden State Pathways Program would support the needs of the applicant’s underrepresented pupils.

(4) A description of all direct and indirect resources, and partner entities that will support the applicant’s development or implementation of high-quality college and career pathways
 opportunities consistent with the requirements of this chapter.

(5) A description of the applicant’s current and future efforts to sustain the ongoing operation of their Golden State Pathways Program beyond the life of their grant. Additionally, if applicants participate in the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program established pursuant to Section 53070, the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program, or any other state college and career programs, they are encouraged to describe how they will create cohesion between those programs and college and career pathways developed or offered under the Golden State Pathways Program.

(6) Provisions for data collection and recordkeeping necessary to comply with the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 53024 and to verify that the grant funds were expended to develop or implement high-quality college and
 career pathways opportunities consistent with the requirements of this chapter.

(e) (1) An applicant seeking a grant under this chapter may request both a planning and implementation grant.

(2) An applicant that is seeking both a planning and implementation grant shall submit, and receive approval of, a supplemental report to the Superintendent detailing the implementation plan developed using the resources received from their planning grant, before expending their implementation grant resources.

(f) In awarding grants pursuant to this chapter, the Superintendent shall prioritize applications submitted by a high-priority local educational agency that seeks to establish pathways programs in the following areas:

(1) Education,
 including early education and child development.

(2) Computer science.

(3) Health care.

(4) Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics pathways that also focus on climate resilience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 28.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16.5. California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program [53070. - 53076.4.]

53070.

(a) The California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program is hereby established as a state education, economic, and workforce development initiative with the goal of providing pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, with the knowledge and skills necessary to transition to employment and postsecondary education. The purpose of the competitive program is to encourage, maintain, and strengthen the delivery of high-quality career technical education programs.

(b) The following amounts are hereby appropriated to the department from the General Fund for the program established pursuant to this chapter:

(1) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, four hundred million dollars
 ($400,000,000).

(2) For the 2016–17 fiscal year, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000).

(3) For the 2017–18 fiscal year, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000).

(c) For the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive, one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be made available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute, for the program established pursuant to this chapter.

(d) For the 2021–22 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be made available to the department, upon appropriation
 by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute, for the program established pursuant to this chapter.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that one-time funding for career technical education appropriated pursuant to Section 94 of Assembly Bill 121 of the 2024–25 Regular Session (Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2025) be made available to the department for the program established pursuant to this chapter.

(f) Of the amounts appropriated pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), 4 percent is designated for applicants with average daily attendance of less than or equal to 140, 8 percent is designated for applicants with average daily attendance of more than 140 and less than or equal to 550, and 88 percent is designated for applicants with average daily attendance of
 more than 550, unless otherwise determined by the Superintendent in collaboration with the executive director of the state board. For purposes of this section, average daily attendance shall be those figures that are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the previous fiscal year for pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive. For any applicant consisting of more than one school district, county office of education, charter school, or regional occupational center or program (ROCP) operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education, or of any combination of those entities, the sum of the average daily attendance for each of the constituent entities shall be used for purposes of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53070.1.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2018, before awarding any grants under the program, the department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Governor on how it will determine that an applicant has met the minimum eligibility standards of the program. This report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The components that need to be contained in the written commitment required to meet the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 53071 and the process that will be used to determine if a grant recipient has upheld the agreement.

(2) The process that will be used to determine that an applicant, or an applicant’s career technical education program, meets all of the minimum eligibility standards specified in subdivision (c) of Section 53071, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The components that need to be contained in the written agreements required to meet the requirements of paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 53071 and the process that will be used to verify that the partnerships are ongoing and structural.

(B) The process for determining that programs reflect regional or local labor market demands and focus on current or emerging high-skill, high-wage, or high-demand occupations.

(C) The
 process for determining that programs are informed by the regional plan developed by their Strong Workforce Program consortium and in effect during the period for which the grant is awarded.

(D) The mechanisms that will be used by the department to collect and report data submitted pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (c) of Section 53071.

(E) The process that will be used by the department to verify that an applicant receiving a renewal grant includes career technical education programs in its local control and accountability plan and annual update.

(b) Before awarding grants under the program for the 2021–22 fiscal year, the department shall submit an updated report, as outlined in subdivision (a), detailing the process they will use to determine and verify that an applicant meets the minimum eligibility
 standards of the program. Annually thereafter, the department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Governor of any changes to the updated information reported pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 3.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

53070.1.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2018, before awarding any grants under the program, the department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Governor on how it will determine that an applicant has met the minimum eligibility standards of the program. This report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The components that need to be contained in the written commitment required to meet the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 53071 and the process that will be used to determine if a grant recipient has upheld the agreement.

(2) The process that will be used to determine that an
 applicant, or an applicant’s career technical education program, meets all of the minimum eligibility standards specified in subdivision (c) of Section 53071, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The components that need to be contained in the written agreements required to meet the requirements of paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 53071 and the process that will be used to verify that the partnerships are ongoing and structural.

(B) The process for determining that programs reflect regional or local labor market demands and focus on current or emerging high-skill, high-wage, or high-demand occupations.

(C) The process for determining that programs are informed by the regional plan developed by their Strong Workforce Program consortium and in effect during the period for which
 the grant is awarded.

(D) The mechanisms that will be used by the department to collect and report data submitted pursuant to paragraph (12) of subdivision (c) of Section 53071.

(E) The process that will be used by the department to verify that an applicant receiving a renewal grant includes career technical education programs in its local control and accountability plan and annual update.

(b) Before awarding grants under the program for the 2021–22 fiscal year, the department shall submit an updated report, as outlined in subdivision (a), detailing the process they will use to determine and verify that an applicant meets the minimum eligibility standards of the program. Annually thereafter, the department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the
 Governor of any changes to the updated information reported pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 4.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

53071.

The department shall administer this program as a competitive grant program. An applicant shall demonstrate all of the following to be considered for a grant award:

(a) (1) A proportional dollar-for-dollar match as follows for any funding that an applicant is determined to be eligible to receive under the allocation formula established pursuant to Section 53076:

(A) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, one dollar ($1) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(B) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(C) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017, two dollars ($2) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(D) (i) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, and each fiscal year thereafter, two dollars ($2) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, the proportional dollar-for-dollar match shall be encumbered in the fiscal year for which an applicant is applying to receive a grant under the program.

(2) In the event an applicant is unable to fully match the amount of funding that the allocation formula determines that they are eligible to receive, the applicant’s award shall be reduced to the amount necessary for the applicant to meet the requirements of this subdivision. Under no
 circumstances shall an applicant be awarded an amount higher than the amount that the allocation formula determines them to be eligible to receive under the program.

(3) That local match may include funding from school district and charter school local control funding formula apportionments pursuant to Section 42238.02, the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) (Public Law 115-224), the California Partnership Academies, the Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Grant, or any other allowable source except as provided in paragraph (4).

(4) That local match shall not include funding from the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program established pursuant to Section 88827 or the Career Technical Education Facilities Program established pursuant to Section 17078.72.

(5) An applicant’s matching funds shall be used to support the program or programs for which the applicant was awarded a grant.

(b) A three-year plan for continued financial and administrative support of career technical education programs that demonstrates a financial commitment of no less than the amount expended on those programs in the previous fiscal year. The plan, at a minimum, shall include the identification of available funding within an applicant’s current or projected budget to continue to support career technical education programs and a written commitment to do so. If an applicant consisting of more than one school district, county office of education, charter school, or regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education, or any combination of these entities, is applying for grant funding from this program, identification of available funding and a written
 commitment shall be demonstrated by each participating constituent entity.

(c) The applicant, or the applicant’s career technical education program, as applicable, meets all of the following minimum eligibility standards:

(1) Offers high-quality curriculum and instruction aligned with the California Career Technical Education Model Curriculum Standards, including, but not limited to, providing a coherent sequence of career technical education courses that enable pupils to transition to postsecondary education programs that lead to a career pathway or attain employment or industry certification upon graduation from high school, including programs that integrate academic and career technical education and that offer the opportunity for participants to prepare for postsecondary enrollment and to earn postsecondary credits through Advanced Placement courses, International
 Baccalaureate courses, or by formal agreement with a postsecondary partner to provide dual enrollment opportunities.

(2) Provides pupils with quality career exploration, guidance, and a continuum of work-based learning opportunities aligned with academic coursework, which may include paid internships.

(3) Provides pupil support services, including counseling and leadership development, to address pupils’ social, emotional, career, and academic needs.

(4) Provides for system alignment, coherence, and articulation, including ongoing and structural regional or local partnerships with postsecondary educational institutions, documented through formal written agreements allowing for dual enrollment opportunities.

(5) Forms ongoing and meaningful industry and
 labor partnerships, evidenced by written agreements and through participation on advisory committees and collaboration with business and labor organizations to provide opportunities for pupils to gain access to preapprenticeships, internships, industry certifications, and work-based learning opportunities as well as opportunities for industry to provide input to the career technical education programs and curriculum.

(6) Provides opportunities for pupils to participate in after school, extended day, and out-of-school internships, competitions, leadership development opportunities, career and technical education student organizations, and other work-based learning opportunities.

(7) Reflects regional or local labor market demands, and focuses on current or emerging high-skill, high-wage, or high-demand occupations, and is informed by the regional plan of the local Strong Workforce
 Program consortium.

(8) Leads to an industry-recognized credential or certificate, or appropriate postsecondary education or training, employment, or a postsecondary degree.

(9) Is staffed by skilled teachers or faculty, and provides professional development opportunities for any teachers or faculty members supporting pupils in those programs.

(10) Provides opportunities for pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs to participate in all programs.

(11) (A) Reports data to the Superintendent, no later than November 1 of each fiscal year, as a program participation requirement, to allow for an evaluation of the program.

(B) Data reported pursuant to this
 paragraph shall include, but not be limited to, the quality indicators described in the California State Plan for Career Technical Education required by the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V), and each of the following metrics, disaggregated by race and gender:

(i) The high school graduation rate.

(ii) The number of pupils completing career technical education coursework.

(iii) The number of pupils meeting academic and career-readiness standards as defined in the College/Career Indicator associated with the California School Dashboard.

(iv) The number of pupils obtaining an industry-recognized credential, certificate, license, or other measure of technical skill attainment.

(v) The number of former pupils employed and the types of businesses in which they are employed.

(vi) The number of former pupils enrolled in each of the following:

(I) A postsecondary educational institution.

(II) A state apprenticeship program.

(III) A form of job training other than a state apprenticeship program.

(C) No later than November 30 of each fiscal year, the California Workforce Pathways Joint Advisory Committee, established pursuant to Section 12053, shall review the data metrics specified in subparagraph (B) and make recommendations to the Department of Finance, the Governor, and the appropriate policy and fiscal
 committees of the Legislature as to both of the following topics:

(i) Whether these data metrics remain the most appropriate metrics to measure and evaluate program outcomes for both new and renewal applicants.

(ii) Whether other metrics should be included.

(D) The department shall make the data reported pursuant to subparagraph (B) available to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in the manner and form requested by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, on or before December 30 of each fiscal year to ensure that data is included in the California Community Colleges LaunchBoard data platform.

(d) This
 section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 5.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

53071.

The department shall administer this program as a competitive grant program. An applicant shall demonstrate all of the following to be considered for a grant award:

(a) (1) A proportional dollar-for-dollar match as follows for any funding that an applicant is determined to be eligible to receive under the allocation formula established pursuant to Section 53076:

(A) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, one dollar ($1) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(B) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for every one dollar ($1) received from this
 program.

(C) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017, two dollars ($2) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(D) (i) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, and each fiscal year thereafter, two dollars ($2) for every one dollar ($1) received from this program.

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, the proportional dollar-for-dollar match shall be encumbered in the fiscal year for which an applicant is applying to receive a grant under the program.

(2) In the event an applicant is unable to fully match the amount of funding that the allocation formula determines that they are eligible to receive, the applicant’s award shall be reduced to the amount necessary for the applicant to meet the requirements of this
 subdivision. Under no circumstances shall an applicant be awarded an amount higher than the amount that the allocation formula determines them to be eligible to receive under the program.

(3) That local match may include funding from school district and charter school local control funding formula apportionments pursuant to Section 42238.02, the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) (Public Law 115-224), the California Partnership Academies, the Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Grant, or any other allowable source except as provided in paragraph (4).

(4) That local match shall not include funding from the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program established pursuant to Section 88827 or the Career Technical Education Facilities Program established pursuant to Section 17078.72.

(5) An applicant’s matching funds shall be used to support the program or programs for which the applicant was awarded a grant.

(b) A three-year plan for continued financial and administrative support of career technical education programs that demonstrates a financial commitment of no less than the amount expended on those programs in the previous fiscal year. The plan, at a minimum, shall include the identification of available funding within an applicant’s current or projected budget to continue to support career technical education programs and a written commitment to do so. If an applicant consisting of more than one school district, county office of education, charter school, or regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education, or any combination of these entities, is applying for grant funding from this program,
 identification of available funding and a written commitment shall be demonstrated by each participating constituent entity.

(c) The applicant, or the applicant’s career technical education program, as applicable, meets all of the following minimum eligibility standards:

(1) Offers high-quality curriculum and instruction aligned with the California Career Technical Education Model Curriculum Standards, including, but not limited to, providing a coherent sequence of career technical education courses that lead to a career pathway that enables pupils to transition to employment or to postsecondary education in either of the following:

(A) Programs that integrate academic and career technical education and that offer the opportunity for participants to prepare for postsecondary enrollment and to earn postsecondary
 credits through Advanced Placement courses, International Baccalaureate courses, or by formal agreement with a postsecondary partner to provide dual enrollment opportunities.

(B) Programs that allow pupils to attain employment upon graduation from high school, including through industry certifications, preapprenticeships, or apprenticeships.

(2) Provides pupils with quality career exploration, guidance, and a continuum of work-based learning opportunities aligned with academic coursework, which may include paid internships or service learning.

(3) Provides pupil support services, including counseling and leadership development, to address pupils’ social, emotional, career, and academic needs.

(4) Provides for system alignment, coherence, and
 articulation, including ongoing and structural regional or local partnerships with postsecondary educational institutions, documented through formal written agreements allowing for dual enrollment opportunities and partnerships to establish new or expand existing career pathways, including, but not limited to, green technology, health care, information technology, education, and artificial intelligence.

(5) Collaborates with labor and business entities for purposes of placement of pupils in apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, dual enrollment opportunities, earn and learn opportunities, service learning, and work-based learning opportunities.

(6) Provides opportunities for pupils to participate in after school, extended day, and out-of-school internships, competitions, leadership development opportunities, career and technical education student organizations, and other work-based
 learning opportunities.

(7) Ensures career programs and career pathways are aligned with workforce needs and labor market demand, as identified through local, regional, or statewide economic and workforce development plans, Strong Workforce Program consortia plans, other relevant labor market information, and employer engagement.

(8) Leads to an industry-recognized credential or certificate, or appropriate postsecondary education or training, employment, or a postsecondary degree.

(9) Is staffed by skilled teachers or faculty, and provides professional development opportunities for any teachers or faculty members supporting pupils in those programs.

(10) Provides opportunities for pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs to participate in all
 programs.
